src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------

! э̄ а̄ ӣ о̄ ӯ ю̄ я̄ е̄
LEXICON Cases ! to be removed.
#;

LEXICON POSS_SG_CNS_NOM
# ;
+PxSg1:%>в%{A%} # ; 
+PxSg2:%>с%{A%} # ; 
+PxSg3:%>н%{A%} # ; 
+PxPl1:%>%{V%}ун # ; 
+PxPl12:%>%{V%}ун # ; 
+PxPl2:%>сун # ; 
+PxPl3:%>тын # ; 

LEXICON POSS_SG_OTHER
# ;
+PxSg1:%>%{i%}в # ; 
+PxSg2:%>%{i%}с # ; 
+PxSg3:%>%{i%}н # ; 
+PxPl1:%>%{V%}ун # ; 
+PxPl12:%>%{i%}т # ; 
+PxPl2:%>%{i%}сун # ; 
+PxPl3:%>%{i%}тын # ; 

LEXICON POSS_LN
# ;
+PxSg1:%>%{V%}и%{ː%} # ; 
+PxSg2:%>%{L%}и # ; 
+PxSg3:%>ин # ; 
+PxPl1:%>%{V%}ун # ; 
+PxPl12:%>%{V%}ун # ; 
+PxPl2:%>%{D%}ы # ; 
+PxPl3:%>%{L%}ун # ; 


! stem _ [alienable poss.] _ number _ case _ [pers/refl. poss.]

LEXICON CASE_OBL_VOW
CASE_OBL_VOW_ONLY ;
CASE_OBL_COMMON ;
INS_OTHER ;

LEXICON CASE_OBL_CNS
CASE_OBL_CNS_ONLY ;
CASE_OBL_COMMON ;
INS_OTHER ;

LEXICON CASE_OBL_LN
CASE_OBL_CNS_ONLY ;
CASE_OBL_COMMON ;
INS_LN ;



LEXICON CASE_OBL_VOW_ONLY
+Loc:%>л%{A%}{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;         ! Местный Locative
+All:%>тки{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;            ! Направителый Allative
+Prl:%>ли{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;            ! Продольный Prolative

LEXICON CASE_OBL_CNS_ONLY
+Loc:%>%{D%}ул%{A%}{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;         ! Местный Locative
+All:%>тыки{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;            ! Направителый Allative
+Prl:%>%{D%}ули{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;            ! Продольный Prolative

LEXICON CASE_OBL_COMMON
+Acc+Def:%>%{V%}%{A%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;		 ! Винительный Accusative
+Acc+Ind:%>%{j%}%{A%} POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Винительный-неопределёний Indefinite Acc
+Dat:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;		 ! Дателный Dative
+Ter:%>%{i%}кл%{A%}%{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;    ! Направительно-местный Terminative
+Dir:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ;        ! Направительно-продольный Directive
+Abl:%>%{D%}ук POSS_SG_OTHER ;		 ! Отложительный Ablative
+Ela:%>%{G%}ит POSS_SG_OTHER ;		 ! Исходный Elative
+Com:%>нун POSS_SG_OTHER ;        ! Совместный Comitative


LEXICON INS_LN
+Ins:%>ди POSS_SG_OTHER ;		 ! Творительный Instrumental

LEXICON INS_OTHER
+Ins:%>%{i%}т POSS_SG_OTHER ;		 ! Творительный Instrumental



LEXICON N_BIRA
+N: X_BIRA ;

LEXICON X_BIRA 
+Sg+Nom:   # ;
+Sg+Nom:  POSS_SG_OTHER ;
+Sg:  CASE_OBL_VOW ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%{i%}л   # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%{i%}л POSS_LN ;
+Pl:%>%{i%}л   CASE_OBL_LN ;

LEXICON N_UMUK
+N: X_UMUK ;

LEXICON X_UMUK
+Sg+Nom:  POSS_SG_CNS_NOM ;
+Sg:  CASE_OBL_CNS ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%{i%}л   # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%{i%}л POSS_LN ;
+Pl:%>%{i%}л   CASE_OBL_LN ;

LEXICON N_ORON
+N: X_ORON ;

LEXICON X_ORON
+Sg+Nom:н # ;
+Sg+Nom:н POSS_LN ;
+Sg:н CASE_OBL_LN ;
+Pl+Nom:%>р # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>р POSS_LN ;
+Pl:%>р CASE_OBL_LN ;

LEXICON N_XXX                               ! Pending categorisation

+N+Sg+Nom: # ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
